Illinois, session 104th, SB627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/1-1)  (from Ch. 43, par. 93.9)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act may be cited as the the Liquor Control 8Act of 1934.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)